District of Columbia statutes.
1-1318

Alteration of boundaries; change of surveys.

Whenever the proprietor of any tract or parcel of land in the District of Columbia shall desire or deem it necessary to subdivide or alter boundaries, or change the surveys of any such tract or parcel of land, such subdivision, alteration, or change shall be by the Surveyor of the District of Columbia, or his Assistant, only, and shall be entered in the plat book or books of said Surveyor. All such subdivisions, alterations, or changes shall be certified by the Surveyor, the party wishing such plat, and 2 competent witnesses, whose names shall be appended thereto.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1427, ch. 854, § 1595

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-918.
1973 Ed., § 1-618.